Utah statutes.
63I-1-278.   Repeal dates, Title 78A and Title 78B.

(1)  The Office of the Court Administrator, created in Section 78A-2-105, is repealed July 1, 2018.

(2)  Section 78A-2-227.1 is repealed July 1, 2014.

(3)  Section 78B-3-421, regarding medical malpractice arbitration agreements, is repealed July 1, 2019.

(4)  Title 78B, Chapter 6, Part 2, Alternative Dispute Resolution is repealed July 1, 2016.

(5)  The following are repealed December 31, 2014:

(a)  Subsection 78B-6-802(1)(i);

(b)  the language in Subsection 78B-6-802(1)(a) that states "except as provided in Subsection (1)(i)"; and

(c)  the language in Subsection 78B-6-802(1)(b) that states "and except as provided in Subsection (1)(i)".

(6)  Section 78B-6-901.5, regarding notice to tenants on residential rental property to be foreclosed, is repealed December 31, 2014.



Amended by Chapter 416, 2013 General Session

